District of Columbia statutes.
50-1331.03

Duty to notify lessors, purchasers, Department, of Flood Vehicle Status.

(a)

An owner or lessor of a Flood Vehicle transferring ownership of the Flood Vehicle shall:

(1)

Prior to the transfer, give the transferee written notice that the vehicle is a Flood Vehicle; and

(2)

Notify the Department that the vehicle is a Flood Vehicle, in accordance with procedures established by the Department.

(b)

A lessee of a vehicle that becomes a Flood Vehicle shall, within 30 days of the damage, give the lessor written notice that the vehicle is a Flood Vehicle.

Apr. 8, 2005, D.C. Law 15-307, § 103, 52 DCR 1700